Utah statutes.
4-39-305.   Transportation of domesticated elk to or from domesticated elk facilities.

Any domesticated elk transferred to or from a domesticated elk facility within the state shall be:

(1)  accompanied by a brand inspection certificate specifying the following:

(a)  the name, address, and facility license number of the source;

(b)  number, sex, and individual identification number; and

(c)  name, address, and facility license number of the destination;

(2)  accompanied by proof of genetic purity as provided in Section 4-39-301; and

(3)  inspected by the department as provided in Section 4-39-306.

